incubator/apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="spik__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="spik"><i>spik</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tyrispik"><i>tyrispik</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tyrespik"><i>tyrespik</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="styreår"><i>styreår</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vemjing"><i>vemjing</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sveittereim"><i>sveittereim</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="våtmyr"><i>våtmyr</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tørrsild"><i>tørrsild</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stølshelg"><i>stølshelg</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vårsild"><i>vårsild</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="utfartsår"><i>utfartsår</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="storsild"><i>storsild</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="strømsild"><i>strømsild</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trettandehelg"><i>trettandehelg</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stillehavsøy"><i>stillehavsøy</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vemming"><i>vemming</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="søkkjemyr"><i>søkkjemyr</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tømmermannsøks"><i>tømmermannsøks</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="våpenøks"><i>våpenøks</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vintersild"><i>vintersild</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vrikkeår"><i>vrikkeår</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stridsøks"><i>stridsøks</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="telgjeøks"><i>telgjeøks</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trafikkår"><i>trafikkår</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spekesild"><i>spekesild</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vassår"><i>vassår</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sursild"><i>sursild</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tverrelv"><i>tverrelv</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vassild"><i>vassild</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vesterhavsøy"><i>vesterhavsøy</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="straumsild"><i>straumsild</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="villspik"><i>villspik</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="turrsild"><i>turrsild</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="snaumyr"><i>snaumyr</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stingsild"><i>stingsild</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ungmøy"><i>ungmøy</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ungmerr"><i>ungmerr</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="steinrøys"><i>steinrøys</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vedøks"><i>vedøks</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="varår"><i>varår</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spydøks"><i>spydøks</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trafikkøy"><i>trafikkøy</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="soling"><i>soling</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="søkkemyr"><i>søkkemyr</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vass-sild"><i>vass-sild</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="storrmyr"><i>storrmyr</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="veikår"><i>veikår</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vulkanøy"><i>vulkanøy</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trøyeerm"><i>trøyeerm</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="torvmyr"><i>torvmyr</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="viftereim"><i>viftereim</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spjutøks"><i>spjutøks</i><par n="spik__n"/></e>
